Utah statutes.
53-10-603.   Creation of Statewide Unified E-911 Emergency Service Account.

(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Statewide Unified E-911 Emergency Service Account," consisting of:

(a)  proceeds from the fee imposed in Section 69-2-5.6;

(b)  money appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature; and

(c)  contributions of money, property, or equipment from federal agencies, political subdivisions of the state, persons, or corporations.

(2)  The money in this restricted account shall be used exclusively for the following statewide public purposes:

(a)  enhancing public safety as provided in this chapter;

(b)  providing a statewide, unified, wireless E-911 service available to public safety answering points;

(c)  providing reimbursement to providers for certain costs associated with Phase II wireless E-911 service; and

(d)  paying for an outside consultant hired by the Utah 911 Committee to study and advise the committee regarding public safety answering points.



Amended by Chapter 278, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 307, 2010 General Session

